New York, session 2025-2026, S456.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of 2 section 168-a of the correction law, as amended by chapter 23 of the 3 laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) a conviction of or a conviction for an attempt to commit any of 5 the provisions of sections 120.70, 130.20, 130.25, 130.30, former 6 section 130.40, former section 130.45, sections 130.60, 230.34, 7 230.34-a, 250.50, 255.25, 255.26 and 255.27 or article two hundred 8 sixty-three of the penal law, or section 135.05, 135.10, 135.20 or 9 135.25 of such law relating to kidnapping offenses, provided the victim 10 of such kidnapping or related offense is less than seventeen years old 11 and the offender is not the parent of the victim, or for a sexually 12 motivated felony pursuant to section 130.91, or section 230.04, where 13 the person patronized is in fact less than seventeen years of age, 14 230.05, 230.06, 230.11, 230.12, 230.13, subdivision two of section 15 230.30, section 230.32, 230.33, or 230.34 of the penal law, or section 16 230.25 of the penal law where the person prostituted is in fact less 17 than seventeen years old, or 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 19 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01613-01-5